Maryland, session 2025, SB0253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
7–239.1.
(a) In §§ 7–239.1 through 7–239.4 7–239.5 of this subtitle the following words
have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Chemical warfare material” means any of the following:
(i) Adamsite (Phenarsazine chloride);
(ii) GA (Ethyl–N, N–dimethyl phosphoramidocyanidate);
(iii) GB (Isopropyl methyl phosphonofluoridate);
(iv) GD (Pinacolyl methylphosphonofluoridate);
(v) H, HD (Bis(2–chloroethyl) sulfide);
(vi) HT (60 percent HD and 40 percent T
(Bis[2(2–chloroethyl– thio)ethyl]ester));
(vii) L (Dichloro(2–chlorovinyl)arsine);
(viii) T (2–2’ Di (3–chloroethylthio)–diethyl ether); or
(ix) VX (O–ethyl–S–(2–diisopropylaminoethyl) methyl
phosphonothiolate).
(2) “Chemical warfare material” includes any substance that has chemical
warfare material as an active or principal ingredient or ingredients, and degradation
products of chemical warfare material.
(C) “MAXIMUM CREDIBLE EVENT” MEANS A HYPOTHETICAL, WORST–CASE
EXPLOSION, FIRE, OR TOXIC AGENT RELEASE THAT IS REALISTICALLY POSSIBLE.

SENATE BILL 253 3
(c) (D) (1) “Monitoring data” means data from actual stack emissions under
all operating conditions at a controlled hazardous substance facility.
(2) “Monitoring data” does not include trial burn data or data derived from
incineration of agent simulants.
(D) (E) “RESEARCH FACILITY” MEANS A FACILITY DESIGNATED BY THE
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE FOR THE RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, AND
DEMONSTRATION OF TECHNOLOGIES RELATED TO CHEMICAL WARFARE
MATERIALS.
7–239.2.
(a) The State of Maryland finds that the chemical warfare materials specified
under § 7–239.1 of this subtitle were designed for warfare, specifically the destruction of
human beings, and for no legitimate civilian industrial use.
(b) The State recognizes the need to dispose of these chemical warfare materials
as safely as possible, ensuring the health and safety of State residents by the regulation of
their release into the environment.
(c) Since these chemical warfare materials are highly toxic or carcinogenic, in
addition to any other applicable requirements at law, the State shall require [without
exemption or waiver] that an applicant for the treatment by incineration of chemical
warfare materials shall comply with all [the] APPLICABLE requirements of this subtitle
and all APPLICABLE regulations adopted under this subtitle.
(D) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION OR IN §§ 7–239.3 AND 7–239.4 THROUGH
7–239.5 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF THE DEPARTMENT TO
APPLY REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO A CHEMICAL WARFARE
MATERIAL THAT IS A CONTROLLED HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCE.
7–239.3.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE INCINERATION OF CHEMICAL
WARFARE MATERIALS AT A RESEARCH FACILITY IF THE INCINERATION IS DONE FOR
RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, OR DEMONSTRATION PURPOSES.
[(a)] (B) A chemical warfare material that is a solid waste is a controlled
hazardous substance.
[(b)] (C) (1) SUBJECT TO § 7–239.5 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THIS
SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE INCINERATION OF CHEMICAL WARFARE

SENATE BILL 253
MATERIALS AT A RESEARCH FACILITY IF THE INCINERATION IS DONE FOR
RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, OR DEMONSTRATION PURPOSES.
(2) In addition to any other applicable requirements, the Department may
not issue a permit for the construction, material alteration, or operation of a controlled
hazardous substance facility to be used for the treatment by incineration of a chemical
warfare material unless:
(1) (I) The permit applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the
Department prior to issuance of a controlled hazardous substance facility permit:
(i) 1. That the proposed incinerator technology has consistently
met all applicable federal and State performance standards in an operational facility
comparable to the proposed facility for a period of time and under conditions acceptable to
the Department;
(ii) 2. That emissions and monitoring data from a comparable
facility demonstrate compliance with State toxic air pollutant standards established under
Title 2 of this article;
(iii) 3. That a destruction and removal efficiency of 99.9999
percent is achievable for each chemical warfare material to be incinerated at the facility;
(iv) 4. That the applicant has made adequate provision to
support and fund the development of a plan that demonstrates the capability of removing,
sheltering, and protecting persons from the largest area at risk from a worst–case release,
as defined by the Department;
(v) 5. That an emergency preparedness plan has been developed
with adequate public participation that provides training, coordination, and equipment
necessary for State and local emergency response personnel and community members to
respond to a release of a chemical warfare material from the proposed facility; and
(vi) 6. That the emergency preparedness plan has been
presented at public meetings in each county potentially impacted by a worst–case release;
(2) (II) The Department finds that the applicant has fully evaluated all
reasonable alternative methods for treatment or disposal including transport to a less
populated disposal site in order to create less risk of release or harm to the general public
or the environment; and
(3) (III) The local governing body of each county and municipal
corporation included in the worst–case release has a reasonable opportunity to review and
provide comment on the facility permit application and the emergency preparedness plan
under paragraph (1)(v) of this subsection ITEM (I)5 OF THIS PARAGRAPH.

SENATE BILL 253 5
7–239.4.
(A) THIS SUBJECT TO § 7–239.5 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THIS SECTION DOES NOT
APPLY TO THE INCINERATION OF CHEMICAL WARFARE MATERIALS AT A RESEARCH
FACILITY IF THE INCINERATION IS DONE FOR RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, OR
DEMONSTRATION PURPOSES.
[(a)] (B) The Department shall require as conditions of operation of a controlled
hazardous substance facility to be used for the treatment by incineration of a chemical
warfare material that:
(1) Treatment by incineration be monitored on a continuous basis;
(2) Monitoring data be regularly reviewed by a qualified independent third
party selected by the Department; and
(3) Monitoring data and reviews be reported to the Department in the
manner and frequency determined appropriate by the Department.
[(b)] (C) Any permit issued under this section shall be for a quantity that is
specifically identified and:
(1) May be renewed for good cause as to the length of time for completion
of the incineration authorized under the permit; but
(2) May not be modified as to the amount of controlled hazardous substance
to be destroyed.
[(c)] (D) After destruction of the specific quantity of the controlled hazardous
substance allowed by the terms of the permit issued under this section, the incinerator shall
be disassembled and disposed of in accordance with all applicable federal and State
performance standards and in a time period established by the permit.
[(d)] (E) In addition to the facility permit fee required under § 7–237 of this
subtitle, the applicant shall pay the compensation of an independent third party with whom
the Department may contract for the review of application materials and monitoring data.
7–239.5.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE A RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, AND
DEMONSTRATION PERMIT FOR THE INCINERATION OF CHEMICAL WARFARE
MATERIALS AT A RESEARCH FACILITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION ARE IN ADDITION TO ANY
GENERAL REQUIREMENTS FOR RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, AND DEMONSTRATION

SENATE BILL 253
PERMITS, INCLUDING GENERAL REQUIREMENTS RELATED TO PUBLIC
PARTICIPATION IN THE PERMITTING PROCESS.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ISSUE A PERMIT UNDER THIS
SECTION UNLESS:
(I) THE PERMIT APPLICANT DEMONSTRATES TO THE
SATISFACTION OF THE DEPARTMENT PRIOR TO THE ISSUANCE OF THE PERMIT THAT:
1. THE APPLICANT HAS MADE ADEQUATE PROVISIONS
TO SUPPORT AND FUND THE DEVELOPMENT OF A PLAN THAT DEMONSTRATES THE
CAPABILITY OF EVACUATING, SHELTERING, AND PROTECTING PERSONS FROM THE
LARGEST AREA AT RISK FROM A MAXIMUM CREDIBLE EVENT, AS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT;
2. AN EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS PLAN HAS BEEN
DEVELOPED THAT ENUMERATES THE TRAINING, COORDINATION, AND EQUIPMENT
NECESSARY FOR STATE AND LOCAL EMERGENCY RESPONSE PERSONNEL AND
COMMUNITY MEMBERS TO RESPOND TO A RELEASE OF A CHEMICAL WARFARE
MATERIAL FROM THE RESEARCH FACILITY; AND
3. THE EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS PLAN HAS BEEN
DEVELOPED WITH ADEQUATE PUBLIC PARTICIPATION AND PRESENTED AT PUBLIC
MEETINGS IN EACH COUNTY POTENTIALLY IMPACTED BY A MAXIMUM CREDIBLE
EVENT; AND
(II) THE LOCAL GOVERNING BODY OF EACH COUNTY AND
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION INCLUDED IN THE MAXIMUM CREDIBLE EVENT HAS A
REASONABLE OPPORTUNITY TO REVIEW AND PROVIDE COMMENT ON THE PERMIT
APPLICATION AND THE EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS PLAN UNDER ITEM (I)2 OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(B) A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) LIMIT THE DURATION OF THE PERMIT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
DEPARTMENT REGULATIONS;
(2) PROVIDE FOR THE RECEIPT AND TREATMENT BY THE RESEARCH
FACILITY OF ONLY THOSE TYPES AND QUANTITIES OF CHEMICAL WARFARE
MATERIALS THAT THE DEPARTMENT CONSIDERS NECESSARY FOR PURPOSES OF
DETERMINING THE EFFICACY AND PERFORMANCE CAPABILITIES OF THE
INCINERATION TECHNOLOGY OR PROCESS; AND

SENATE BILL 253 7
(3) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDE
REQUIREMENTS AS THE DEPARTMENT CONSIDERS NECESSARY TO PROTECT HUMAN
HEALTH AND THE ENVIRONMENT, INCLUDING REQUIREMENTS REGARDING:
(I) MONITORING;
(II) OPERATION;
(III) FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY;
(IV) CLOSURE AND REMEDIAL ACTION; AND
(V) ANY OTHER MATTER THAT THE DEPARTMENT CONSIDERS
NECESSARY RELATED TO TESTING AND PROVIDING INFORMATION TO THE
DEPARTMENT WITH RESPECT TO THE OPERATION OF THE RESEARCH FACILITY.
(C) IN DEVELOPING PERMIT REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) REQUIRE CONTINUOUS NEAR–REAL TIME AIR EMISSIONS
MONITORING, WITH A LAG TIME OF NOT MORE THAN 10 MINUTES, DURING
INCINERATION; AND
(2) CONSIDER THE NEED FOR SOIL AND WATER POLLUTION
MONITORING.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ORDER AN IMMEDIATE TERMINATION OF ALL
INCINERATION OPERATIONS AT A RESEARCH FACILITY AT ANY TIME THE
DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT TERMINATION IS NECESSARY TO PROTECT
HUMAN HEALTH OR THE ENVIRONMENT.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE A RESEARCH FACILITY THAT
RECEIVES A PERMIT UNDER THIS SECTION TO:
(I) AT LEAST ONCE EVERY YEAR, REPORT TO THE
DEPARTMENT ON OPERATIONS UNDER THE PERMIT, INCLUDING:
1. THE QUANTITIES AND TYPES OF CHEMICAL WARFARE
MATERIALS INCINERATED DURING THE REPORTING PERIOD;
2. THE RESULTS OF ALL EMISSIONS AND POLLUTION
MONITORING UNDERTAKEN UNDER THE PERMIT; AND

SENATE BILL 253
3. ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUESTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 2 YEARS, CONDUCT AND SUBMIT TO
THE DEPARTMENT AN ASSESSMENT OF INCINERATION ACTIVITIES CONDUCTED
UNDER THE PERMIT ON LOCAL ECOSYSTEMS, PUBLIC HEALTH, AND AIR QUALITY.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT:
(I) SHALL REVIEW ALL REPORTS AND ASSESSMENTS
SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) MAY, ON THE BASIS OF A REPORT OR ASSESSMENT
SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, MODIFY OR REVOKE A PERMIT ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) TO THE EXTENT THAT DOING SO IS CONSISTENT WITH §
4–352 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE, MAKE ALL REPORTS AND
ASSESSMENTS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AVAILABLE ON THE
DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE; AND
(II) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, SUBMIT ALL REPORTS AND ASSESSMENTS REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY,
AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE ENVIRONMENT AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMITTEE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.